Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1015
State-owned licensable passenger vehicles; title in transportation services bureau; purchases; restrictions.

Subject to the provisions of section 81-1013, the transportation services bureau shall own and hold title, in the name of the State of Nebraska, to all state-owned licensable passenger vehicles. All purchases of state-owned passenger vehicles and automotive equipment shall be made or approved by the transportation services bureau. The Director of Administrative Services shall not approve any voucher for the purchase of any passenger car unless submitted by the transportation services bureau.

Laws 1969, c. 770, § 8, p. 2921;

Laws 1975, LB 474, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 15.